Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 508.792 is repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 508.778 is amended to read:
508.778. [Except as provided in ORS 508.792, no ] On or after the  effective date of this 2024
Act,  new vessel permits [ shall] may not  be issued.
SECTION 3. (1) The  State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall convene a work group
of relevant  stakeholders to provide recommendations on a voluntary Columbia River gillnet
vessel permit buyback program.
(2) The work group  shall consist of at least six members selected by the State Fish and
Wildlife Director, including but not limited to:
(a) Two members representing Columbia River gillnet vessel permit holders;
(b) One member representing Oregon seafood processors;
(c) One member representing Columbia River recreational fishing businesses;
(d) One member  representing a nonprofit organization comprised of Columbia River rec-
reational anglers; and
(e) One member representing a nonprofit organization focused on  the conservation of
Columbia River salmonid populations.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Consider how a voluntary Columbia  River gillnet vessel permit buyback program in
Oregon can best complement the Columbia River gillnet fishing license reduction program
implemented by the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife; and
(b) Make recommendations on:
(A) The specifics of a voluntary Columbia River gillnet  vessel permit buyback program;
and
(B) Any changes to laws, rules or funding levels that would be needed in order to  imple-
ment the program.
(4) All  recommendations described in subsection (3) of this section must be consistent
with tribal treaty fishing rights and all fishery management agreements  between Indian
tribes and this state.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1509 (SB 1509-A) Page 1
(5) The department shall report  on the recommendations described in subsection (3) of
this section, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the committees or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural  resources, in the manner provided
under ORS 192.245, no later than November 15, 2024.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1509 (SB 1509-A) Page 2